Wisconsin, session 2025, SB864.
do enact as follows:SB864,11Section 1. 940.302 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB864,2,72940.302 (4) In any criminal proceeding for a violation of sub. (2) or civil action 3under sub. (3), the identifying information of a child victim or child witness shall be 4sealed and may not be disclosed to the public unless the court orders the disclosure 5to be made after a hearing in which the court takes into consideration the health, 6safety, and liberty of the child and determines that the disclosure is in the interest 7of justice.SB864,28Section 2. 948.051 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB864,2,149948.051 (4) In any criminal proceeding for a violation of sub. (1) or (2) or civil 10action under sub. (3), the identifying information of a child victim or child witness 11shall be sealed and may not be disclosed to the public unless the court orders the 12disclosure to be made after a hearing in which the court takes into consideration 13the health, safety, and liberty of the child and determines that the disclosure is in 14the interest of justice.SB864,315Section 3. 950.04 (1v) (eg) of the statutes is created to read:SB864,2,1916950.04 (1v) (eg) If the victim is a child, in any criminal proceeding for a 17violation of s. 940.302 or 948.051, to be provided any courtroom supports that the 18court finds necessary to support the health, safety, or liberty of the child and 19determines are in the interest of justice.SB864,420Section 4. 950.04 (2w) (fg) of the statutes is created to read:SB864,3,41950.04 (2w) (fg) If the witness is a child, in any criminal proceeding for a 2violation of s. 940.302 or 948.051, to be provided any courtroom supports that the 3court finds necessary to support the health, safety, or liberty of the child and 4determines are in the interest of justice.SB864,3,55